District of Columbia statutes.
23-550

Inventory.

Within a reasonable time but not later than ninety days after the filing of an application for an order of approval under section 23-548 which is denied, or the termination of the period of any order or extensions thereof, the issuing or denying judge shall cause to be served, on the persons named in the order or the application, and such other parties to intercepted communications as the judge may determine, in his discretion, are necessary in the interest of justice, an inventory which shall include notice of —

(1)

the fact of the entry of the order or the application for an order of approval which was denied;

(2)

the date of the entry of the order or the denial of the application for an order of approval;

(3)

the period of authorized, approved, or disapproved interception; and

(4)

whether during the period wire or oral communications were intercepted.

The judge, upon the filing of a motion, may in his discretion make available to the person or his counsel for inspection such portions of the intercepted communications, applications, and orders as the judge determines to be in the interests of justice. On an ex parte showing of good cause to a judge, the serving of the inventory required by this subsection may be postponed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 624, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-548, § 23-551, and § 23-556.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-550.
1973 Ed., § 23-550.